Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Regulation of Dental Hygienists.

Sec. 08.32.100.
Employment of dental hygienists. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.32.110.
Scope of practice of dental hygienists.

The role of the dental hygienist is to assist members of the dental profession in providing oral health care to the public. A person licensed to practice the profession of dental hygiene in the state may,

under the general supervision of a licensed dentist,

perform preliminary charting and triage to formulate a dental hygiene assessment and dental hygiene treatment plan;

remove calcareous deposits, accretions, and stains from the exposed surfaces of the teeth beginning at the epithelial attachment by scaling and polishing techniques;

remove marginal overhangs;

use local periodontal therapeutic agents;

perform nonsurgical periodontal therapy;

perform other dental operations and services delegated by a licensed dentist if the dental operations and services are not prohibited by (c) of this section;

if certified by the board, administer local anesthetic agents; and

if certified by the board and under the direct or indirect supervision of a licensed dentist, administer and monitor nitrous oxide-oxygen conscious sedation.

The board shall specify by regulation those additional functions that may be performed by a licensed dental hygienist only upon successful completion of a formal course of instruction approved by the board. The board shall adopt regulations specifying the education requirements, evaluation procedures, and degree of supervision required for each function.

This section does not authorize delegation of

dental diagnosis, comprehensive treatment planning, and writing

prescriptions for drugs;

authorizations for restorative, prosthetic, or orthodontic appliances;

operative or surgical procedures on hard or soft tissues; or

other procedures that require the professional competence and skill of a dentist.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 111 SLA 2008.]

This section does not prohibit a licensed dental hygienist

with an endorsement issued under AS

08.32.085

from performing the activities authorized under AS

08.32.085

;

who has entered into a collaborative agreement approved by the board under AS

08.32.115

from performing the activities authorized under the collaborative agreement; or

from performing a dental operation, procedure, or service a dentist may delegate to a dental assistant under AS

08.36.346

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 78 SLA 1953; am § 6 ch 36 SLA 1969; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 1978; am §§ 11, 12 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1995; am §§ 2, 3 ch 24 SLA 2001; am §§ 2, 3, 8 ch 111 SLA 2008; am § 5 ch 58 SLA 2010; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, paragraph (c)(1) was rewritten to add subparagraphs following “writing”.

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local anesthetic agents by dental hygienists, see 12 AAC 28, art. 3.

For professional practices, see 12 AAC 28, art. 7.

Sec. 08.32.115.
Collaborative agreements.

If the collaborative agreement is approved by the board under (d) of this section, a licensed dental hygienist with a minimum of 4,000 documented hours of clinical experience within the five years preceding application for the board’s approval may enter into a collaborative agreement with a licensed dentist in which the licensed dentist authorizes the licensed dental hygienist to perform one or more of the following:

oral health promotion and disease prevention education;

removal of calcareous deposits, accretions, and stains from the surfaces of teeth;

application of topical preventive or prophylactic agents, including fluoride varnishes and pit and fissure sealants;

polishing and smoothing restorations;

removal of marginal overhangs;

preliminary charting and triage to formulate a dental hygiene assessment and dental hygiene treatment plan;

the exposure and development of radiographs;

use of local periodontal therapeutic agents; and

performance of nonsurgical periodontal therapy, with or without the administration of local anesthesia, subsequent to a licensed dentist’s authorization or diagnosis as specified in the licensed hygienist’s collaborative agreement.

The services described in (a) of this section may be performed under a collaborative agreement approved by the board

without the presence of the licensed dentist;

in a setting other than the usual place of practice of the licensed dentist; and

without the dentist’s diagnosis and treatment plan unless otherwise specified in the collaborative agreement or in (a) of this section.

The board shall adopt regulations regarding approval of collaborative agreements between licensed dental hygienists and licensed dentists.

The board may approve a collaborative agreement between a licensed dentist and a licensed dental hygienist. However, the board may not approve more than five collaborative agreements with a licensed dentist, not including any collaborative agreements that have been terminated. A licensed dental hygienist shall notify the board of the termination of a collaborative agreement with a licensed dentist.

History.

(§ 4 ch 111 SLA 2008; am §§ 12, 13 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.32.120.
Place of employment. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.32.130.
Information required. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.32.140.
Supervision required. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.32.150.
Revocation of dentist’s license. [Repealed, § 32 ch 49 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.36.315.]

Sec. 08.32.160.
Grounds for discipline, suspension, or revocation of license.

The board may revoke or suspend the license of a dental hygienist, or may reprimand, censure, or discipline a licensee, if, after a hearing, the board finds that the licensee

used or knowingly cooperated in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation to obtain a license, certificate, or endorsement;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing or billing for professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the licensee’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter or under AS 08.36, or with an order of the board;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

addiction or dependence on alcohol or other drugs that impairs the licensee’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability;

engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional service to patients;

performed clinical procedures without being under the supervision of a licensed dentist;

did not conform to professional standards in delivering dental hygiene services to patients regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred.

History.

(§ 6 ch 78 SLA 1953; am § 11 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 14 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For other disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For continuing professional competence requirements, see 12 AAC 28, art. 4.

Sec. 08.32.165.
Limits or conditions on license; discipline.

In addition to action under AS

08.32.160

, upon a finding that by reason of demonstrated problems of competence, experience, education or health the authority to practice dental hygiene should be limited or conditioned or the practitioner disciplined, the board may reprimand, censure, place on probation, restrict practice by specialty, procedure or facility, require additional education or training, or revoke or suspend a license.

[Repealed by § 15 ch 59 SLA 1978.]

History.

(§ 7 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 15 ch 59 SLA 1978)

Sec. 08.32.170.
Procedure followed. [Repealed, § 15 ch 59 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.32.171.
Disciplinary sanctions.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

The board may summarily suspend the license of a licensee who refuses to submit to a physical or mental examination under AS

08.36.070(b)(1)

. A person whose license is suspended under this section is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) within seven days after the effective date of the order. If, after a hearing, the board upholds the suspension, the licensee may appeal the suspension to a court of competent jurisdiction.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 14 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 17 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 10 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For further provisions, see AS

08.01.075

.

Sec. 08.32.180.
Penalty for violations.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter for which a penalty is not otherwise provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding AS

08.01.075(a)(8)

, the board may impose a civil fine not to exceed $25,000 for each violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 5 ch 78 SLA 1953; am § 15 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.